languagetool-language-modules/fr_MG/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/fr/hunspell/fr_FR.aff
# This Source Code Form is subject to the terms of the Mozilla Public
# License, v. 2.0. If a copy of the MPL was not distributed with this
# file, You can obtain one at http://mozilla.org/MPL/2.0/.

# AFFIXES DU DICTIONNAIRE ORTHOGRAPHIQUE FRANÇAIS “TOUTES VARIANTES” v6.1
# par Olivier R. -- licence MPL 2.0
# Généré le 10-06-2017 à 13:32
# Pour améliorer le dictionnaire, allez sur http://www.dicollecte.org/



SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -’'1234567890


TRY abdefghijklmnoprstvyzABDEFGHIJKLMNOPRSTVYZôÔ

FLAG long

FULLSTRIP

PFX FI Y 2
PFX FI 0 fi .
PFX FI 0 FI .

PFX MP Y 2
PFX MP 0 mpi .
PFX MP 0 MPI .

PFX MI Y 2
PFX MI 0 mi .
PFX MI 0 MI .

SFX AN Y 2
SFX AN a ana .
SFX AN a ANA .
